Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-1,103
Invalidity of acts; effect.

If any provision of the Nebraska Bingo Act, the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, the Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, or the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act or the application of such acts to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of the acts or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected.

Laws 1988, LB 1232, § 3.

Nebraska Bingo Act, see section 9-201.

Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.

Nebraska Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-401.

Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, see section 9-301.

Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act, see section 9-501.